src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.aff
# P
# solu variantes logudoresas in -are chentza sas formas 
# chi rechedint a.g.
SFX P Y 135
SFX P are amos are  #  abboghinamos       
SFX P are amus are
SFX P are ades are
SFX P are aes are
SFX P are ai are
SFX P are aia are
SFX P are aio are
SFX P are aias are
SFX P are ais are
SFX P are aiat are
SFX P are ait are
SFX P are aiamus are
SFX P are aimus are
SFX P are aizis are
SFX P are aiant are
SFX P are aint are
SFX P are ei are
SFX P are esi are
SFX P are eis are
SFX P are esis are
SFX P are eit are
SFX P are esit are
SFX P are emus are
SFX P are estis are
SFX P are eint are
SFX P are esint are
SFX P are hei [cg]are
SFX P are hesi [cg]are
SFX P are heis [cg]are
SFX P are hesis [cg]are
SFX P are heit [cg]are
SFX P are hesit [cg]are
SFX P are hemus [cg]are
SFX P are hestis [cg]are
SFX P are heint [cg]are
SFX P are hesint [cg]are
SFX P are emas are  #  chi abboghinemas 
SFX P are emus are
SFX P are edas are
SFX P are hemas [cg]are  #  chi manighemas
SFX P are hemus [cg]are
SFX P are hedas [cg]are
SFX P are era are  #  chi abboghinera  
SFX P are ere are
SFX P are eras are
SFX P are eres are
SFX P are erat are
SFX P are eret are
SFX P are eremus are
SFX P are erezis are
SFX P are erant are
SFX P are erent are
SFX P are hera [cg]are  #  chi manighera 
SFX P are here [cg]are
SFX P are heras [cg]are
SFX P are heres [cg]are
SFX P are herat [cg]are
SFX P are heret [cg]are
SFX P are heremus [cg]are
SFX P are herezis [cg]are
SFX P are herant [cg]are
SFX P are herent [cg]are
SFX P are ade are  #  abboghinade
SFX P are ae are
SFX P are àdemi are  #  abboghinàdemi
SFX P are àdemi are
SFX P are àdebbos are
SFX P are àebbos are
SFX P are àdennos are
SFX P are àennos are
SFX P are àdedha are
SFX P are àdedhas are
SFX P are àdela are
SFX P are àela are
SFX P are àdelas are
SFX P are àelas are
SFX P are àdelu are
SFX P are àelu are
SFX P are àdedhu are
SFX P are àdedhos are
SFX P are àdelos are
SFX P are àelos are
SFX P are adu are  #  istimadu
SFX P are au are  #  istimau
SFX P are ados are  #  istimados
SFX P are aos are  #  istimaos
SFX P are ada are  #  istimada
SFX P are adas are  #  istimadas
SFX P are andhe are
SFX P are anne are
SFX P are ando are
SFX P are endhe are
SFX P are enne are
SFX P are hendhe [cg]are  #  lighendhe
SFX P are henne [cg]are  #  lighenne
SFX P are àndhemi are
SFX P are ànnemi are
SFX P are hèndhemi [cg]are
SFX P are hènnemi [cg]are
SFX P are àndhedi are
SFX P are ànnedi are
SFX P are hèndhedi [cg]are
SFX P are hènnedi [cg]are
SFX P are àndhelu are
SFX P are àndhelos are
SFX P are ànnedhu are
SFX P are ànnedhos are
SFX P are ànnelu are
SFX P are ànnelos are
SFX P are hèndhelu [cg]are
SFX P are hèndhelos [cg]are
SFX P are hènnelu [cg]are
SFX P are hènnelos [cg]are
SFX P are àndhela are
SFX P are àndhelas are
SFX P are ànnedha are
SFX P are ànnedhas are
SFX P are ànnela are
SFX P are ànnelas are
SFX P are hèndhela [cg]are
SFX P are hèndhelas [cg]are
SFX P are hènnela [cg]are
SFX P are hènnelas [cg]are
SFX P are àndhennos are
SFX P are àndhebbos are
SFX P are ànnennos are
SFX P are ànnebbos are
SFX P are hèndhennos [cg]are
SFX P are hèndhebbos [cg]are
SFX P are hènnennos [cg]are
SFX P are hènnebbos [cg]are
SFX P are àndhesi are
SFX P are ànnesi are
SFX P are hèndhesi [cg]are
SFX P are hènnesi [cg]are

# Q
# I Coniugatzione in -iare Log. (b'at formas chi rechedint a. gràficu e formas chi
# no leant sa /i/ de servítziu chi bi est in verbos che abbasciare, arrangiare) 
SFX Q Y 66
SFX Q iare iamos iare  #  abbasciamos, arrangiamos 
SFX Q iare iamus iare  #  abbasciamus
SFX Q iare iaus iare  #  abbasciaus
SFX Q iare iades iare  #  abbasciades
SFX Q iare iaes iare  #  abbasciaes
SFX Q iare iaia iare  #  abbasciaia, arrangiaia
SFX Q iare iaio iare
SFX Q iare iao iare
SFX Q iare iavo iare
SFX Q iare iaias iare
SFX Q iare iavas iare
SFX Q iare iaiat iare
SFX Q iare iavat iare
SFX Q iare iaiamus iare
SFX Q iare iaiaus iare
SFX Q iare iaimus iare
SFX Q iare iavamus iare
SFX Q iare iaizis iare
SFX Q iare iavazes iare
SFX Q iare iaiant iare
SFX Q iare iavant iare
SFX Q iare ei iare  #  abbascei, arrangei
SFX Q iare esi iare
SFX Q iare eis iare
SFX Q iare esis iare
SFX Q iare eit iare
SFX Q iare esit iare
SFX Q iare emus iare
SFX Q iare estis iare
SFX Q iare eint iare
SFX Q iare esint iare
SFX Q iare e iare  #  chi abbasce, arrange 
SFX Q iare es iare  #  chi abbasces
SFX Q iare et iare  #  chi abbascet
SFX Q iare emas iare  #  chi abbascemas, arrangemas 
SFX Q iare emus iare
SFX Q iare edas iare
SFX Q iare ent iare
SFX Q iare era iare  #  chi abbascera, arrangera  
SFX Q iare ere iare
SFX Q iare eras iare
SFX Q iare eres iare
SFX Q iare erat iare
SFX Q iare eret iare
SFX Q iare eremus iare
SFX Q iare erezis iare
SFX Q iare erant iare
SFX Q iare erent iare
SFX Q iare iade iare  #  abbasciade, arrangiade
SFX Q iare iae iare
SFX Q iare iàdelu/v iare  #  abbasciàdemi, arrangiàdemi
SFX Q iare iàelu/v iare
SFX Q iare iadu iare  #  abbasciadu
SFX Q iare iau iare
SFX Q iare iados iare
SFX Q iare iaos iare
SFX Q iare iada iare
SFX Q iare iadas iare
SFX Q iare iandhe iare  #  abbasciandhe
SFX Q iare iando iare  #  abbasciando
SFX Q iare endhe iare  #  abbascendhe
SFX Q iare enne iare  #  abbascenne
SFX Q iare iàndhelu/v iare  #  abbasciàndhemi
SFX Q iare iànnelu/v iare
SFX Q iare iàndhesi iare
SFX Q iare iànnesi iare

# S
# I Coniugatzione in -iare Log. (bat formas chi rechedint a. gràficu 
# e formas chi no leant sa /i/ de servítziu chi però abbarrat in tzertas 
# formas de su cong. trabàgl-i-e) 
SFX S Y 63
SFX S iare iamos iare  #  trabagliamos
SFX S iare iamus iare
SFX S iare iaus iare
SFX S iare iades iare
SFX S iare iaes iare
SFX S iare iaia iare  #  trabagliaia
SFX S iare iaio iare
SFX S iare iao iare
SFX S iare iavo iare
SFX S iare iaias iare
SFX S iare iavas iare
SFX S iare iaiat iare
SFX S iare iavat iare
SFX S iare iaiamus iare
SFX S iare iaiaus iare
SFX S iare iaimus iare
SFX S iare iavamus iare
SFX S iare iaizis iare
SFX S iare iavazes iare
SFX S iare iaiant iare
SFX S iare iavant iare
SFX S iare iei iare  #  trabagliei
SFX S iare iesi iare
SFX S iare ieis iare
SFX S iare iesis iare
SFX S iare ieit iare
SFX S iare iesit iare
SFX S iare iemus iare
SFX S iare iestis iare
SFX S iare ieint iare
SFX S iare iesint iare
SFX S iare iemas iare  #  chi trabagliemas
SFX S iare iemus iare
SFX S iare iedas iare
SFX S iare ietas iare
SFX S iare iera iare  #  chi trabagliera 
SFX S iare iere iare
SFX S iare ieras iare
SFX S iare ieres iare
SFX S iare ierat iare
SFX S iare ieret iare
SFX S iare ieremus iare
SFX S iare ierezis iare
SFX S iare ierant iare
SFX S iare ierent iare
SFX S iare iade iare  #  trabagliade
SFX S iare iae iare
SFX S iare iàdelu/v iare  #  abbasciàdemi, arrangiàdemi
SFX S iare iàelu/v iare
SFX S iare iadu iare  #  trabagliadu
SFX S iare iau iare
SFX S iare iados iare
SFX S iare iaos iare
SFX S iare iada iare
SFX S iare iadas iare
SFX S iare iandhe iare  #  trabagliandhe
SFX S iare iando iare
SFX S iare iendhe iare
SFX S iare ienne iare
SFX S iare iàndhelu/v iare  #  abbasciàndhemi
SFX S iare iànnelu/v iare
SFX S iare iàndhesi iare
SFX S iare iànnesi iare


#########################################################################
# De sos pagos verbos de sa II coniug. - unos 500 - sunt in su voc. cun sas 
# formas de totu sa coniugatzione solu unos 160 de sos printzipales o prus 
# manizados, unos 98 log./nuor. e unos 65 camp. 
#########################################################################
