src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.dic
abangiare/Qb
abbangiare/Qb
abbanzulare/Pb
abbardulare/Pb
abbarrigare/Pb
abbasciare/Qb
abbatilare/Pb
abbatussiare/Pb
abbeliare/Pb
abbetuare/Pb
abbigiare/Qb
abbisciare/Qb
abboghiare/Pb
abbogiare/Qb
abboginare/Pb
abborriare/Pb
abbrengulare/Pb
abbrunciare/Qb
abbrusciare/Qb
abbufiare/Pb
abbungiare/Qb
abburrusciare/Qb
abbusciare/Qb
abbussiare/Pb
acabulare/Pb
acafiare/Pb
acanagliare/Sb
acansciare/Qb
achesciare/Qb
achessiare/Pb
achichiare/Pb
achingiare/Qb
achisciare/Qb
acodomare/Pb
acoliare/Pb
acolumare/Pb
aconciare/Qb
acorbulare/Pb
acorgiare/Qb
acosiare/Pb
acostazare/Pb
acradiare/Pb
acriminare/Pb
acuculliare/Pb
acuguliare/Pb
acurtziare/Pb
acusciare/Qb
addanniai/Pbl
addesumare/Pb
addojulare/Pb
addordigare/Pb
addrommigare/Pb
afasciare/Qb
afinigare/Pb
afogulare/Pb
afoltigare/Pb
aframiare/Pb
afrodhiare/Pb
agghegiare/Pb
aggrapiare/Pb
aggratziare/Pb
aggrunciare/Qb
agiotulare/Pb
alciare/Pb
alidare/Pb
allampiare/Pb
alledaminare/Pb
allezitimare/Pb
alliviare/Pb
allomburare/Pb
allorigare/Pb
allumingiare/Qb
allupiare/Pb
altziare/Pb
ammachiare/Pb
ammaculiare/Pb
ammalaidare/Pb
ammalisciare/Qb
ammanniare/Pb
ammarturare/Pb
ammatzulare/Pb
ammeschiare/Pb
ammisciare/Qb
ammodhigare/Pb
ammortogliare/Sb
ammurgiare/Qb
ammurinare/Pb
ammurutulare/Pb
amplificare/Pb
ampulare/Pb
anneulare/Pb
anniedhigare/Pb
annirghidare/Pb
apaghiare/Pb
apagiare/Qb
apalpidare/Pb
aparpidare/Pb
apasigare/Pb
apedrigare/Pb
aperaulare/Pb
apesciare/Qb
apilliare/Pb
apogiare/Qb
apompiare/Pb
apostrofare/Pb
apranciare/Qb
apraniare/Pb
apretziare/Pb
aproegliare/Sb
apropiare/Pb
arbiare/Pb
arciare/Pb
arragliare/Sb
arrangiare/Qb
arrempiare/Pb
arreulare/Pb
arrodiare/Pb
arrolliare/Pb
artziare/Pb
arvurare/Pb
assachiare/Pb
asseliare/Pb
assetiare/Pb
assotziare/Pb
astriare/Pb
ataciare/Qb
atemperare/Pb
atobiare/Pb
atoliare/Pb
atropegliare/Sb
aturigare/Pb
atzantarare/Pb
averguare/Pb
azogulare/Pb
baliare/Pb
bandhulare/Pb
baragiai/Qb
barminare/Pb
batagliare/Sb
batiare/Pb
batigiare/Qb
beulare/Pb
boghinare/Pb
bombitare/Pb
brufulare/Pb
brugiare/Qb
bugliare/Sb
bulliare/Pb
cabidare/Pb
cadeliare/Pb
cagiare/Qb
cagliare/Sb
calcarare/Pb
calculare/Pb
calliare/Pb
campaniare/Pb
cansciare/Qb
carchidare/Pb
cardiare/Pb
carminare/Pb
carragiare/Qb
carragliare/Sb
cassiare/Pb
catigare/Pb
catzigare/Pb
chensciare/Qb
chesciare/Qb
chindhulare/Pb
chirchinare/Pb
chirtzinare/Pb
ciarrulare/Pb
ciulare/Pb
ciunciare/Qb
codulare/Pb
cogiare/Qb
coloviare/Pb
cominigare/Pb
comunicare/Pb
conchinare/Pb
contoniare/Pb
cordinare/Pb
craminare/Pb
crentiare/Pb
cucuciare/Qb
cumbidare/Pb
degumare/Pb
dilliriare/Pb
dispaciare/Qb
dominare/Pb
fastidiare/Pb
folfigiare/Qb
foscigare/Pb
frichinare/Pb
frisciare/Qb
fruschinare/Pb
frusciare/Qb
fruscinare/Qb
fulminare/Pb
garrigare/Pb
griximare/Pb
illadiare/Pb
illibberare/Pb
illuinare/Pb
imbarrigare/Pb
imbeciare/Qb
imbenugiare/Qb
imbogiare/Qb
imboligare/Pb
imperiare/Pb
impringiare/Qb
impunciare/Qb
incasciare/Qb
incassiare/Pb
incaungiare/Qb
incrispiare/Pb
indisciare/Qb
indrovigare/Pb
ingraidare/Pb
innetiare/Pb
insinnigare/Pb
intennerare/Pb
intortigare/Pb
intzidiare/Pb
intzugliare/Sb
irbagliare/Sb
irbarriare/Pb
irboidare/Pb
irfinigare/Pb
irmanniare/Pb
irranchidare/Pb
isaminare/Pb
isbagliare/Sb
iscacagliare/Sb
iscadriare/Pb
iscarrafiare/Pb
iscarrasciare/Qb
iscartafogliare/Sb
ischeliare/Pb
ischirchinare/Pb
iscomunigare/Pb
iscorgiare/Qb
iscosciare/Qb
iscradiare/Pb
iscuartarare/Pb
iscugiare/Qb
iscungiare/Qb
isempiare/Pb
isfasciare/Qb
isolare/Pb
ispaciare/Qb
ispampinare/Pb
ispedriare/Pb
isperdisciare/Qb
isperiare/Pb
ispinnigare/Pb
ispragiare/Qb
ispuntogliare/Sb
issambenare/Pb
istenteriare/Pb
istidhiare/Pb
istraviare/Pb
istrobogiare/Qb
istropiare/Pb
istropogliare/Sb
isungiare/Qb
lagrimare/Pb
lentinare/Pb
limusinare/Pb
maghinare/Pb
manciare/Qb
marmurare/Pb
maulare/Pb
medagliare/Sb
menguare/Pb
meulare/Pb
minispressiare/Pb
mischiare/Pb
mossigare/Pb
mugiare/Qb
musciare/Pb
musungiare/Qb
navigare/Pb
neciare/Qb
nominare/Pb
obiare/Pb
ogiare/Qb
operare/Pb
orulare/Pb
pendhulare/Pb
perificare/Pb
piculare/Pb
pigiare/Qb
pirinciare/Qb
pisciare/Qb
pissiare/Pb
pitzigare/Pb
pranciare/Qb
premiare/Pb
pronosticare/Pb
prudigare/Pb
rafiare/Pb
ratzigare/Pb
risparmiare/Pb
rosigare/Pb
ruciare/Qb
rugiare/Qb
sagamare/Pb
salargiare/Qb
sarciare/Qb
sartiare/Pb
semeschiare/Pb
sorigare/Pb
suguzare/Pb
tebiare/Pb
tichirriare/Pb
tilingiare/Qb
topigare/Pb
torrulare/Pb
trabagliare/Sb
tramunare/Pb
travagliare/Sb
travigare/Pb
trinnigare/Pb
tripogliare/Sb
trobogiare/Qb
trochigiare/Qb
trodhiare/Pb
trofigiare/Qb
tropogliare/Sb
truvulare/Pb
tzantzigare/Pb
tzirigare/Pb
valutare/Pb
visitare/Pb
